Utah statutes.
78B-5-403.   Scope.
(1)  This part applies only to a foreign-money claim in an action or
distribution proceeding.
(2)  This part applies to foreign-money issues notwithstanding the law
applicable under the conflict of laws rules of this state to other issues in
the action or distribution proceeding.
